Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2634
Violations; administrative fine; enforcement.

Any person violating sections 44-2606 to 44-2635 may after notice and hearing be subject to an administrative fine of not more than five hundred dollars per violation. Such fine may be enforced in the same manner as civil judgments and may be in addition to any denial, suspension, probation, or revocation of a license. Any person charged with a violation of sections 44-2606 to 44-2635 may waive his or her right to a hearing and consent to such discipline as the director determines to be appropriate. All hearings held pursuant to sections 44-2606 to 44-2635 shall be governed by the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1980, LB 481, § 29;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 214.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.